Florida, session 2026, HB4005.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 3 of chapter 69-1326, Laws of Florida,
as amended by chapters 79-516 and 90-468, Laws of Florida, is
amended to read:
Section 3. There is hereby created a body politic and
corporate to be known as the City of Naples Airport Authority
for the purpose of operating and maintaining the airport
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4005 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4005 2026 Legislature
facilities at the City of Naples Municipal Airport, located in
Collier County, Florida, or any other airport in Collier County
which the airport authority may contract to operate. The
authority is hereby constituted a public instrumentality, and
the exercise by the authority of the powers conferred by this
act shall be deemed and held to be the performance of essential
governmental functions.

Said authority shall not transact any business or exercise its
powers hereunder until or unless the city council of the City of
Naples by proper resolution shall declare that there is need for
the authority to function. The determination as to whether there
is such need for the authority to function may be made by the
city council on its own motion. In any suit, action or
proceeding involving the validity or enforcement of or relating
to any contract of the authority, the authority shall be
conclusively deemed to have become established and authorized to
transact business and exercise its powers hereunder upon proof
of the adoption of a resolution by the city council declaring
the need for the authority. A copy of such resolution duly
certified by the clerk shall be admissible in evidence in any
suit, action or proceeding.

The city council by an affirmative vote of four (4) members of
the council shall appoint five (5) persons as members
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4005 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4005 2026 Legislature
commissioners of the authority created for the city. Three (3)
of the members commissioners who are first appointed shall be
designated to serve for terms of 1, 2, and 3 one (1), two (2)
and three (3) years, respectively; and the remaining two (2) of
such members commissioners shall be designated to serve for
terms of 4 four (4) years each, from the date of their
appointment. Thereafter, members commissioners shall be
appointed as aforesaid for a term of office of 4 four (4) years,
except that all vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired
term. No commissioner of the authority may be an officer or
employee of the city. A commissioner shall hold office until his
successor has been appointed and has qualified. A certificate of
the appointment or reappointment of any commissioner shall be
filed with the clerk, and such certificate shall be conclusive
evidence of the due and proper appointment of such commissioner.
A commissioner shall receive no compensation for his services,
but he shall be entitled to the necessary expenses, including
traveling expenses, incurred in the discharge of his duties.

Beginning with the 2026 general election, the authority shall be
composed of five members, with three members, designated as
seats 1, 2, and 3, who are residents of the City of Naples, and
two members, designated as seats 4 and 5, who are residents of
Collier County outside of the municipal boundaries of the City
of Naples. All members shall be elected by the qualified
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4005 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4005 2026 Legislature
electors of Collier County. All members shall be elected at the
2026 general election, with the members elected from odd-
numbered seats for a term of 4 years and even-numbered seats for
a term of 2 years. Thereafter, elections shall be held to
replace members upon expiration of their terms with terms of 4
years each.

Each member must have spent at least 5 years engaged in
financial management, small business operations, or aerospace as
defined in s. 331.303, Florida Statutes. At the time of
qualifying, a candidate for the authority must submit an
affirmation of meeting this requirement to the Supervisor of
Elections. Qualification and election of members of the
authority shall be as prescribed by the general election laws of
Florida.

Members of the authority as of the effective date of this act
shall serve until the certification of the November 2026 general
election results. Each elected member of the authority shall
hold office until a successor has been elected. A vacancy
occurring during a term of a member shall be filled only for the
balance of the unexpired term, such appointments to be made by
the Governor.

100 All meetings of the authority shall be public meetings, and the
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4005 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4005 2026 Legislature
101 powers of the authority shall be vested in the members
102 commissioners thereof in office from time to time. Three members
103 (3) commissioners shall constitute a quorum of the authority for
104 the purpose of conducting its business and exercising its powers
105 and for all other purposes. Action may be taken by the authority
106 upon a vote of a majority of the members commissioners present,
107 unless in any case the bylaws of the authority shall require a
108 larger number. The mayor with the concurrence of the city
109 council shall designate which of the commissioners appointed
110 shall be the first chairman, but when the office of the chairman
111 of the authority thereafter becomes vacant, the authority shall
112 select a chairman from among its commissioners. The authority
113 shall select from among its members commissioners a chair and a
114 vice chair chairman, and it may employ a secretary (who shall be
115 executive director), technical experts and such other officers,
116 agents and employees, permanent and temporary, as it may require
117 and shall determine their qualifications, duties and
118 compensation. For such legal services as it may require, the
119 authority may call upon the chief law officer of the city or may
120 employ its own counsel and legal staff. The authority may
121 delegate to one (1) or more of its agents or employees such
122 powers or duties as it may deem proper.
123
124 For inefficiency or neglect of duty or misconduct in office, a
125 commissioner of the authority may be removed by an affirmative
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4005 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4005 2026 Legislature
126 vote of five (5) members of the city council, but a commissioner
127 shall be removed only after he shall have been given a copy of
128 the charges at least ten (10) days prior to the hearing thereon
129 and had an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel. In
130 the event of the removal of any commissioner, a record of the
131 proceedings, together with the charges and findings thereon,
132 shall be filed in the office of the clerk.
133 Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4005 -01-er